Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1765.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 1435.14, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1435.14. A. An insurance company or insurance producer


shall not pay a commission, service fee, brokerage, or other


valuable consideration to a person for selling, soliciting, or


negotiating insurance in this state if that person is required to be


licensed under this act the Oklahoma Producer Licensing Act and is


not so licensed.


B. A person shall not accept a commission, service fee,


brokerage, or other valuable consideration for selling, soliciting,


or negotiating insurance in this state if that person is required to



Req. No. 2339 Page 1


be licensed under this act the Oklahoma Producer Licensing Act and


is not so licensed.


C. Renewal or other deferred commissions may be paid to a


person for selling, soliciting, or negotiating insurance in this


state if the person was required to be licensed under this act the


Oklahoma Producer Licensing Act at the time of the sale,


solicitation, or negotiation and was so licensed at that time.


D. An insurer or insurance producer may pay or assign


commissions, service fees, brokerages, or other valuable


consideration to an insurance agency or to persons who do not sell,


solicit, or negotiate insurance in this state, unless the payment


would violate Section 1204 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


E. Any commissions, service fees, brokerages, or other valuable


consideration shall be disclosed in an itemized list in advance of


the services provided.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2339 CAD 1/14/2026 3:17:12 PM













Req. No. 2339 Page 2